Arkansas, session 2025, HB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-44-110(b)(1), concerning lien attachment
and priority, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The liens for labor performed or materials or fixtures
furnished, as provided for in this subchapter, shall attach to the
improvement on which the labor was performed or the materials or fixtures
were furnished in preference subject to any encumbrance existing on the real
estate prior to the commencement of construction or repair of the
improvement.
(B)(i) In all cases in which the prior encumbrance was
given for the purpose of funding construction or repair of the improvement,
that lien shall have priority over all liens given by this subchapter.
(ii)(a) A person who acquires or intends to acquire
a mortgage or other security instrument that provides a security interest for
the purpose of funding construction or repair of the improvement may
*ANS148*
03-13-2025 10:26:02 ANS148

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 HB1271
conclusively rely on an affidavit made by a licensed appraiser, architect,
surveyor, or engineer if the licensed appraiser, architect, surveyor, or
engineer has inspected the property at a specified time and work had not been
commenced or materials placed at its site at the time of the inspection, if
the inspection occurs and the affidavit is filed within four (4) business
days before or within four (4) business days after the filing of the mortgage
or other security instrument that provides a security interest.
(b) When a mortgage or other security interest
for the purpose of funding construction or repair of the improvement will
encumber property on which a residential structure that is a single one-to-
four family unit is located or will be constructed, the person who made the
affidavit described in subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section may be an
employee or designee of the lender or licensed title agent.
(iii) The facts in an affidavit filed under
subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section:
(a) Shall be considered true at the time of
the inspection; and
(b) Shall remain true at the time of the
filing of the mortgage or other security instrument that provides a security
interest.
(iv) The correctness of the facts contained in an
affidavit filed under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section shall not be
controverted to affect the priority of the rights of the person to whom or
for whom it is given, unless actual fraud by that person is proved.
(v) A person who provides a false affidavit under
subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii) of this section shall be responsible for any loss
or damage suffered by a person whose rights are adversely affected.
(C) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, in the
event that construction commences before the recordation of the mortgage or
other security instrument that provides a security interest for the purpose
of funding construction or repair of the improvement, only the liens for
providing labor, materials, or supplies before the recordation of the
mortgage or other security instrument that provides a security interest shall
have priority over the mortgage or other security instrument that provides a
security interest.

03-13-2025 10:26:02 ANS148

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 HB1271
/s/Warren



































03-13-2025 10:26:02 ANS148